Utah statutes.
78B-2-113.   Effect of payment, acknowledgment, or promise to pay.
(1)  An action for recovery of a debt may be brought within the applicable
statute of limitations from the date:
(a)  the debt arose;
(b)  a written acknowledgment of the debt or a promise to pay is made by the
debtor; or
(c)  a payment is made on the debt by the debtor.
(2)  If a right of action is barred by the provisions of any statute, it shall
be unavailable either as a cause of action or ground for defense.
